Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-7450
Fees.

(1) Licensure activities under the Wholesale Drug Distributor Licensing Act shall be funded by license fees. An applicant for an initial or renewal license under the act shall pay a license fee as provided in this section.

(2) License fees shall include (a) a base fee of fifty dollars and (b) an additional fee of not more than five hundred dollars based on variable costs to the department of inspections and of receiving and investigating complaints, other similar direct and indirect costs, and other relevant factors as determined by the department.

(3) If the licensure application is denied, the license fee shall be returned to the applicant, except that the department may retain up to twenty-five dollars as an administrative fee and may retain the entire license fee if an inspection has been completed prior to such denial.

(4) The department shall also collect a fee for reinstatement of a license that has lapsed or has been suspended or revoked. The department shall collect a fee of ten dollars for a duplicate original license.

(5) The department shall remit all license fees collected under this section to the State Treasurer for credit to the Health and Human Services Cash Fund. License fees collected under this section shall only be used for activities related to the licensure of wholesale drug distributors or for the payment of expenses related to the prescription drug monitoring system created under section 71-2454.

Laws 2006, LB 994, § 24;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 673;

Laws 2017, LB331, § 37;

Laws 2026, LB867, § 24.
July 18, 2026